District of Columbia statutes.
42-3151.02

Repealed

Petition for immediate taking

Repealed.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, §§ 401-413, 48 DCR 1888
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 103, 49 DCR 1468

Delegation of Authority Under the Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2010-139, August 20, 2010 ( 57 DCR 7740).

Delegation of Authority Under the Anti Graffiti Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2010-176, November 26, 2010 ( 57 DCR 11421).

Section 601 of D.C. Law 13-281 provided: “The Mayor may issue rules to implement the Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Properties Omnibus Amendment Act of 2000 in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.”